Utah, session 2026, HB401.
Section 1. Section 63I-2-279 is amended to read:63I-2-279. Repeal dates: Title 79.(1)Section 79-2-407, Study of funding for water infrastructure costs, is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)Subsection 79-4-1002(2), regarding a pilot program for veteran free admission to state parks, is repealed July 1, 2025.(3)Section 79-6-410, Geothermal energy facilities study, is repealed July 1, 2028.(3)(4)Title 79, Chapter 6, Part 14, Energy Project Assessment, is repealed January 1, 2028.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 79-6-410 is enacted to read:79-6-410. Geothermal energy facilities study.(1)As used in this section, "coal-powered electrical generation facility site" means a location in the state where a facility that generates electricity using coal as a primary fuel source:(a)is currently operating; or(b)has ceased operations but retains existing infrastructure suitable for energy generation purposes.(2)On or before October 31, 2027, Utah State University shall conduct a study on the geological and environmental impacts of geothermal energy development in the state, which shall include:(a)an assessment of subsurface geological conditions and the interactions with geothermal energy development activities;(b)an evaluation of geothermal energy development techniques and the relative impacts on surrounding geological and environmental conditions;(c)an assessment of the geological and environmental impacts of geothermal energy development at or near coal-powered electrical generation facility sites; and(d)recommendations for geothermal energy development practices that minimize geological and environmental impacts.(3)Upon completion of the study described in Subsection (2), Utah State University shall report the findings on or before the November interim meeting to the Public Utilities, Energy, and Technology Interim Committee.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.